Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS

§342J-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Any state" means any of the several
states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin
Islands, Guam, American Samoa, and the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana
Islands.

"Complaint" means any written charge
filed with or by the department that a person is violating any provision of
this chapter or any rule or order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Director" means the director of
health or the director's authorized agent.

"Disposal" means the discharge,
deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking, or placing of any hazardous or
solid waste into or on any land or water so that hazardous or solid waste or
any constituent thereof may enter the environment, be emitted into the air, or
discharged into any waters, including ground waters.

"Financial responsibility" means a
trust fund, surety bond, insurance, corporate guarantee, or letter of credit
provided by owners or operators of hazardous waste treatment, storage, and
disposal facilities to assure proper closure, post closure, corrective action,
and compensation for injuries to people or damage to property.

"Generator" means any person, by
site, whose act or process produces hazardous waste or whose act first causes a
hazardous waste to become subject to regulation under this chapter.

"Hazardous waste" means a solid
waste, or combination of solid wastes, which because of its quantity,
concentration, or physical, chemical, or infectious characteristics may:

(1) Cause or significantly contribute to an increase
in mortality or an increase in a serious irreversible or incapacitating
reversible illness; or

(2) Pose a substantial existing or potential hazard
to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored,
transported, disposed of, or otherwise managed.

"Hazardous waste broker" means any
person who:

(1) Acts as an intermediary between:

(A) A generator and a transporter; or

(B) A generator and a person who treats,
stores, or disposes of hazardous waste; or

(C) A generator and another broker; and

(2) Performs one or more of the following:

(A) Mixes hazardous wastes of different United
States Department of Transportation shipping descriptions by placing them into
a single container or tank as defined in 40 Code of Federal Regulations Part
260 (provided that a broker who mixes hazardous waste must comply with all
statutory and regulatory provisions applicable to generators);

(B) Packages or repackages hazardous waste;

(C) Labels, marks, or manifests hazardous
waste;

(D) Performs waste characterization of
hazardous waste; or

(E) Arranges the storage, treatment,
transportation, disposal, or recycling of hazardous waste for a fee based upon
the completion of the transaction.

"Hazardous waste management" means
the systematic control over the generation, collection, source separation,
storage, transportation, processing, treatment, recovery, and disposal of
hazardous waste.

"Hazardous waste management facility"
or "facility" means all contiguous land and structures, other
appurtenances, and improvements on the land used for treating, storing, or
disposing of hazardous waste. A facility may consist of several treatment,
storage, or disposal operational units (for example, one or more landfills,
surface impoundments, or combinations of them).

"Household waste" means any material
(including garbage, trash and sanitary wastes in septic tanks) derived from
households (including single and multiple residences, hotels, motels, bunk
houses, ranger stations, crew quarters, campgrounds, picnic grounds and day
user recreation areas).

"Manifest" means the form used for
identifying the quantity, composition, origin, routing, and destination of
hazardous waste during its transportation from the point of generation to the
point of treatment, storage, or disposal.

"Operator" means the person
responsible for the overall operation of a facility.

"Owner" means the person who owns the
facility or part of the facility.

"Party" means each person or agency
named as party or properly entitled to be a party in any court or agency
proceeding.

"Permit" means written authorization
from the director for the owner or operator of a proposed or existing hazardous
waste management facility to engage in the treatment, storage, or disposal of
hazardous waste. A permit authorizes the owner or operator to treat, store, or
dispose of hazardous waste in a manner or amount, or to do any act, not
forbidden by this chapter or by rules adopted under this chapter, but requiring
review by the department.

"Person" means any individual,
partnership, firm, joint stock company, association, public or private
corporation, federal agency, the State or any of its political subdivisions,
any state and any of its political subdivisions, trust, estate, interstate
body, or any other legal entity.

"Pollution" means hazardous waste
pollution.

"RCRA" means the Resource Conservation
and Recovery Act, as amended, 42 United States Code §§6901 to 6991i.

"Solid waste" means garbage, refuse,
and other discarded materials, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained
gaseous materials resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and
agricultural operations, sludge from waste treatment plants and water supply
treatment plants, and residues from air pollution control facilities and
community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved material in
domestic sewage, irrigation return flows, or industrial discharges which are
subject to permit under chapter 342D.

"Storage" means the containment of
hazardous waste, temporarily or for a period of years, in a manner which does
not constitute disposal.

"Transporter" means a person engaged
in the off-site transportation of hazardous waste by air, rail, highway, water,
or pipeline.

"Treatment" means any method,
technique, or process, including neutralization, designed to change the
physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any hazardous
waste so as to neutralize the waste or render it nonhazardous, less hazardous,
safer for transport, amenable for recovery, amenable for storage, or reduced in
volume. This term includes any activity or processing designed to change the
physical form or chemical composition of hazardous waste so as to render it
nonhazardous. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §5; am L 1990, c 298, §9; am L 1991, c 259,
§§3, 4; am L 1994, c 267, §3; am L 1995, c 180, §24]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next